utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
нуне/10,19,24,29,79,335,690,973,1383,1853,1921
габе/10,19,27,79,82,84,318,321,451,553,672,676,700,766,892,973,1491,1660,1853,1921,1945,2612,4889
нули/15,17,256,264,285,2572
саве/4,10,19,24,25,29,79,82,84,96,335,501,795,973,1216,1383,1562,1660,1753,1853,1921,1945,2056,3009
шура/4,5,10,86,139,286,498,520,1088,3551
глад/4,5,6,7,8,14,20,35,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,69,89,91,93,101,111,142,156,160,166,170,199,217,300,478,3190,4336,4337,4487,4488
евти/5,8,35,46,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,103,109,285,361,386,594,612,641,929,1022,3727,4180
цура/54,92,104,156,1048,1088,1109,1204,1205,1332,1406,1469,2904,3011
топла/51,52,817,3505,4271,4335,4871,4872,4873,4874,4875
стева/771,944,985,1048,1088,1204,1205,2981,3320
склучи/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,53,59,71,114,117,118,122,124,126,236
затега/1,2,12,18,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,46,49,54,56,61,67,68,72,74,75,76,77,1095,2139,2225,2363,2542,2667,2668,2669,2670,2671,2672,2673,2674,2675,2676,3321,3500,3501,3502,3503,3544,3545,3546,3547,3548,3549,3550,3593,3594
избега/1,2,5,8,12,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,86,222,677,855,1095,1978,2139,2225,2363,2542,2667,2668,2669,2670,2671,2672,2673,2674,2675,2676,3321,3500,3501,3502,3503,3544,3545,3546,3547,3548,3549,3550,3593,3594
засени/12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,2178,2603,4331,4789
подрек/14,32,94,101,111,576,681,854,972,1931,2888,3541,4063,4330,4425,4556,4633
разлик/3,9,21,26,28,30,34,36,94,101,111,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,1187,1317,1681,1682,1752,1931,2201,2386,2387,2888,3236,3489,3541,3934,3935,3936,3937,3938,3939,3940,3941,4425
создав/3027,4068,4338,4369
шумски/668
планир/706,4092
саботи/8,291,292,309,333,420,442,532,696,724,789,1232,4004
воспита/1,2,5,8,12,13,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,105,109,142,155,166,170,189,413,498,614,693,770,825,855,1081,1095,1260,1264,1570,1726,1900,2020,2188,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860,3098,3522
претрча/1,2,5,8,12,13,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,86,139,222,545,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732
проигра/1,2,5,8,12,13,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,46,47,49,51,52,54,55,57,58,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,86,139,222,545,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732
пронесе/1,2,5,8,12,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,47,49,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,973,3384
вистини/1,4,11,15,17,25,113,221,299,301,319,320,339,348,374,388,408,409,412,470,735,758,787,809,816,1189,1253,1452,1453,1454,1455,1480,1481,1482,1483,1512
наследи/1,7,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,309,333,420,619,627,1728
бубреже/123,2652,4006
стаклен/2,3,9,21,23,30,38,98,148,198,262,284,435,557,1262,1944,4064,4634
сервира/2,5,8,13,18,27,35,49,56,286
прелажа/2,5,8,19,22,25,27,31,32,33,35,37,40,46,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,86,139,222,328,468,514,516,520,527,535,540,545,546,547,552,559,560,561,564,570,571,572,577,578,579,580,582,584,585,586,590,711,712,730,731,732
прокоба/2021,2507,3755
лепосаа/2180
стрепет/3,13,94,101,4362
монтажа/4,1095,1264
пастрма/4,286,395,746,928,1109,1560,1603,3022
подложи/40,651,1010
сврзник/6,537,1827
подготви/1,12,19,22,31,32,33,37,39,40,59,168,415,791,1167,1566,2009,2292,2828,4119
солуњани/168
морфолог/2,6,14,20,89,93,391,487,611,1206,1340,1371,1422,1544,1586,1628,1659,1852,2127,2811,2812,2813,2814,2815,2816,2817,2818,3757,3758
пораскае/3844
медицина/4,5,10,96,141,317,429,707,1183,2202,2390,2395,2505,2819,3269,3492,3493,3494,3495,3496,3497,3498
изјаснел/4635,4943
разблуди/651,696,841,876
трпезарии/1,15,17,99,100,104,187,470,691,704,709,758,816,1454,1455
произведе/1,2,5,8,12,19,22,27,31,32,33,35,37,39,40,47,49,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,973,3384
сообраќај/2,3,5,6,8,14,20,21,26,28,35,47,50,51,52,55,73,83,85,89,142,167,170,192,213,428,767,4361
крушевчани/791,792,1032,1055,1083,1103,3318,3999,4000
стихотворец/1534
